Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER; AGRICULTURE RESEARCH, EDUCATION, EXTENSION, AND TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $11,102,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $11,102,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer (AGREETT) account in the agricultural fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 3. The base for this transfer is $11,102,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AGRICULTURE RESEARCH, EDUCATION, EXTENSION, AND TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin (a) $11,102,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $11,102,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the agriculture research, education, extension, and technology transfer (AGREETT) account in the agricultural fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 3, to the commissioner of agriculture for the AGREETT grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14. To the extent practicable, money expended under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 1, clauses (1) and (2), must supplement and not supplant existing sources and levels of funding. The commissioner of agriculture may use up to one percent of this appropriation for costs incurred to administer the program. Of the amount appropriated for the AGREETT grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14: new text end new text begin (1) $600,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for the Minnesota Agricultural Experiment Station's agriculture rapid response fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.14, subdivision 1, clause (2); new text end new text begin (2) up to $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for research on avian influenza, salmonella, and other turkey-related diseases and disease prevention measures; new text end new text begin (3) $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for grants to the Minnesota Agriculture Education Leadership Council (MAELC) to enhance agricultural education with priority given to farm business management challenge grants. In awarding grants, the MAELC shall prioritize funding for faculty with expertise in farm transition planning, rural mental health, and growing specialty crops in urban areas; new text end new text begin (4) $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for potato breeding; new text end new text begin (5) $802,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $802,000 in fiscal year 2027 are to fund the Forever Green Initiative and protect the state's natural resources while increasing the efficiency, profitability, and productivity of Minnesota farmers by incorporating perennial and winter-annual crops into existing agricultural practices. The base for the allocation under this clause is $802,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. By February 1 each year, the dean of the College of Food, Agricultural and Natural Resource Sciences at the University of Minnesota must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture finance and policy and higher education detailing uses of the funds in this clause, including administrative costs, and the achievements these funds contributed to; new text end new text begin (6) $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for research on natural stands of wild rice; and new text end new text begin (7) $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are for the cultivated wild rice forward selection project at the North Central Research and Outreach Center, including a tenure track or research associate plant scientist. new text end new text begin (b) The base for this appropriation is $11,102,000 in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end